src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON GRINE
+V+Inf:grine    # ;
+V+Imp:grin     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:griner   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:grines   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:grein    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gren     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:grint    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:grinende # ;

LEXICON GRIPE
+V+Inf:gripe    # ;
+V+Imp:grip     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:griper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gripes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:grep     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:greip    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:grepet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gripende # ;

LEXICON GRÅTE
+V+Inf:gråte    # ;
+V+Imp:gråt     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gråter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gråtes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gråt     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:grått    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gråtende # ;

LEXICON GYSE
+V+Inf:gyse    # ;
+V+Imp:gys     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gyser   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyses   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gyste   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gjøs    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gyst    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gysende # ;

LEXICON GYTE
+V+Inf:gyte    # ;
+V+Imp:gyt     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gyter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gytes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gjøt    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gytt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gytende # ;

LEXICON GYVE
+V+Inf:gyve    # ;
+V+Imp:gyv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:gyver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyves   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gjøv    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gøyv    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gyvd    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gjøvet  # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gyvende # ;

LEXICON GÅ
+V+Inf:gå     # ;
+V+Imp:gå     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:går    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gås    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:gikk   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:gått   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:gående # ;

LEXICON HA
+V+Inf:ha     # ;
+V+Imp:ha     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:har    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hadde  # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hatt   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:haende # ;

LEXICON HENGE
+V+Inf:henge    # ;
+V+Imp:heng     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:henger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:henges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hang     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hunget   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hengt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:hengende # ;

LEXICON HETE
+V+Inf:hete    # ;
+V+Imp:het     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:heter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hetes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:het     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hette   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hett    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hetet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:hetende # ;

LEXICON HIVE
+V+Inf:hive    # ;
+V+Imp:hiv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:hiver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hives   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hev     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:heiv    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hivd    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hevet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:hivende # ;

LEXICON HJELPE
+V+Inf:hjelpe    # ;
+V+Imp:hjelp     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:hjelper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hjelpes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hjalp     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hjulpet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:hjelpende # ;

LEXICON HOGGE
+V+Inf:hogge    # ;
+V+Imp:hogg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:hogger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hogges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hogd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hugget   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hogget   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hugd     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:hoggende # ;

LEXICON HOLDE
+V+Inf:holde    # ;
+V+Imp:hold     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:holder   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:holdes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:holdt    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:holdt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:holdende # ;

LEXICON HUGGE
+V+Inf:hugge    # ;
+V+Imp:hugg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:hugger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hugges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hugd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:hogget   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hugd     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:hugget   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:huggende # ;

LEXICON KLINGE
+V+Inf:klinge    # ;
+V+Imp:kling     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:klinger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klinges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:klang     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:klinget   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:klingende # ;

LEXICON KLIPE
+V+Inf:klipe    # ;
+V+Imp:klip     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:kliper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klipes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:klep     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kleip    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:klipt    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:klepet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:klipende # ;

LEXICON KLIVE
+V+Inf:klyve    # ;
+V+Imp:klyv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:klyver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klyves   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kløv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kløyv    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:klauv    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:kløvet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:klyvende # ;

LEXICON KLYPE
+V+Inf:klype    # ;
+V+Imp:klyp     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:klyper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klypes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kløp     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kløyp    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:klaup    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:kløpe    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:klypende # ;

LEXICON KLYVE
+V+Inf:klyve    # ;
+V+Imp:klyv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:klyver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klyves   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:klyv     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:klyv     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:klyvende # ;

LEXICON KNEKKE
+V+Inf:knekke    # ;
+V+Imp:knekk     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:knekker   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knekkes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:knakk     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:knekket   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:knekt     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:knekkende # ;

LEXICON KNESTE
+V+Inf:kneste    # ;
+V+Imp:knest     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:knester   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knestes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:knast     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:knestet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:knestende # ;

LEXICON KNETTE
+V+Inf:knette    # ;
+V+Imp:knett     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:knetter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knettes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:knatt     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:knettet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:knettende # ;

LEXICON KNIPE
+V+Inf:knipe    # ;
+V+Imp:knip     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:kniper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knipes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:knip     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kneip    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:knep     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:knepet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:knipende # ;

LEXICON KOMME
+V+Inf:komme    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:kommer   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kom      # ;
+V+PrfPtc:kommet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:kommende # ;
+V+Imp:kom      # ;

LEXICON KUNNE
+V+Inf:kunne  # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:kan    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:kunne  # ;
+V+PrfPtc:kunnet # ;

LEXICON LA
+V+Inf:la   # ;
+V+Imp:la   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:lar  # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lot  # ;
+V+PrfPtc:latt # ;

LEXICON LE
+V+Inf:le   # ;
+V+Imp:lo   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ler  # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lo   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:ledd # ;

LEXICON LEGGE
+V+Inf:legge    # ;
+V+Inf+Pass:legges    # ;
+V+Imp:legg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:legger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:legges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:la       # ;
+V+PrfPtc:lagt     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:leggende # ;

LEXICON LIGGE
+V+Inf:ligge    # ;
+V+Imp:ligg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ligger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ligges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lå       # ;
+V+PrfPtc:ligget   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:liggende # ;

LEXICON LYDE
+V+Inf:lyde    # ;
+V+Imp:lyd     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:lyder   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lydes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lød     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:lydt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:lydende # ;

LEXICON MÅTTE
+V+Inf:måtte # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:må    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:måtte # ;
+V+PrfPtc:mått  # ;

LEXICON MØTE
     +V+Inf:øte  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:øter # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:øtte # ;
  +V+PrfPtc:øtt  # ;

LEXICON PIPE
+V+Inf:pipe    # ;
+V+Imp:pip     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:piper   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:pipes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:pep     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:peip    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:pepet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:pipende # ;

LEXICON RIVE
+V+Inf:rive    # ;
+V+Imp:riv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:river   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:rev     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:reiv    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:revet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:rivende # ;

LEXICON RYKE
+V+Inf:ryke     # ;
+V+Imp:ryk      # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ryker    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:røk      # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:røyk     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:røket    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:røykende # ;

LEXICON SETTE
+V+Inf:sette    # ;
+V+Imp:sett     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:setter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:settes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:satte    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:satt     # ;
+V+PrsPtc:settende # ;

LEXICON SELGE
+V+Inf:selge    # ;
+V+Imp:selg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:selger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:selges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:solgte   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:solgt    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:selgende # ;

LEXICON SE
+V+Inf:se     # ;
+V+Imp:se     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:ser    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ses    # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sees   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:så     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:sett   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:seende # ;

LEXICON SIGE
+V+Inf:sige    # ;
+V+Imp:sig     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:siger   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:siges   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:seg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:seig    # ;
+V+PrfPtc:siget   # ;
+V+PrfPtc:sigd    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:sigende # ;

LEXICON SITTE
+V+Inf:sitte    # ;
+V+Imp:sitt     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:sitter   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sittes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:satt     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:sittet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:sittende # ;

LEXICON SI
+V+Inf:si     # ;
+V+Imp:si     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:sier   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sies   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:sa     # ;
+V+PrfPtc:sagt   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:siende # ;

LEXICON SKJELVE
+V+Inf:skjelve    # ;
+V+Imp:skjelv     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:skjelver   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjelves   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:skalv      # ;
+V+PrfPtc:skjelvet   # ;
+V+PrsPtc:skjelvende # ;

LEXICON SKJÆRE
+V+Inf:skjære    # ;
+V+Imp:skjær     # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:skjærer   # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjæres   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:skar      # ;
+V+PrfPtc:skåret    # ;
+V+PrsPtc:skjærende # ;
