src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
              grine:       GRINE   ;
              gripe:       GRIPE   ;
            angripe:an       GRIPE   ;
            begripe:be       GRIPE   ;
           forgripe:for       GRIPE   ;
          foregripe:fore       GRIPE   ;
            pågripe:på       GRIPE   ;
              gråte:       GRÅTE   ;
          strigråte:stri       GRÅTE   ;
               gyse:      GYSE    ;
              gyte:       GYTE    ;
              gyve:       GYVE    ;
            avgå:av       GÅ      ;
           forgå:for       GÅ      ;
          framgå:fram       GÅ      ;
       gjennomgå:gjennom       GÅ      ;
            omgå:om       GÅ      ;
           unngå:unn       GÅ      ;
               ha:      HA      ;
          inneha:inne       HA      ;
              henge:       HENGE   ;
            avhenge:av       HENGE   ;
            behenge:be       HENGE   ;
                hete:     HETE    ;
                hive:     HIVE    ;
               hjelpe:      HJELPE  ;
            avhjelpe:av       HJELPE  ;
               hogge:      HOGGE   ;
               holde:      HOLDE   ;
               hugge:      HUGGE   ;
          halshugge:hals       HUGGE   ;
                klinge:     KLINGE  ;
klipe:                     KLIPE   ;
klive:                     KLIVE   ;
    klype:                 KLYPE   ;
      klyve:               KLYVE   ;
       knekke:              KNEKKE  ;
kneste:                     KNESTE  ;
       knette:              KNETTE  ;
          knipe:           KNIPE   ;
            ankomme:an       KOMME   ;
        avstedkomme:avsted       KOMME   ;
         etterkomme:etter       KOMME   ;
          fremkomme:frem       KOMME   ;
         imøtekomme:imøte       KOMME   ;
            omkomme:om       KOMME   ;
            utkomme:ut       KOMME   ;
            la:         LA      ;
              le:       LE      ;
           hånle:hån       LE      ;
         klukkle:klukk       LE      ;
       skoggerle:skogger       LE      ;
        skrattle:skratt       LE      ;
          storle:stor       LE      ;
         rimbelegge:rimbe       LEGGE   ;
          bløtlegge:bløt       LEGGE   ;
           brulegge:bru       LEGGE   ;
          fastlegge:fast       LEGGE   ;
           henlegge:hen       LEGGE   ;
          planlegge:plan       LEGGE   ;
          tørrlegge:tørr       LEGGE   ;
              ligge:       LIGGE   ;
          foreligge:fore       LIGGE   ;
           tilligge:til       LIGGE   ;
lyde:                     LYDE    ;
        adlyde:ad    LYDE    ;
          måtte:           MÅTTE   ;
          møte:m     MØTE    ;
       omstøte:omst  MØTE    ;
      tilstøte:tilst MØTE    ;
          pipe:           PIPE    ;
            avrive:av       RIVE    ;
          rive:      RIVE    ;
           tilrive:til       RIVE    ;
             ryke:        RYKE    ;
            anse:an       SE      ;
            avse:av       SE      ;
         etterse:etter       SE      ;
         forutse:forut       SE      ;
         imøtese:imøte       SE      ;
          overse:over       SE      ;
           unnse:unn       SE      ;
            selge:         SELGE   ;
        videreselge:selge       SELGE   ;
            bisette:bi       SETTE   ;
          fastsette:fast       SETTE   ;
          fremsette:frem       SETTE   ;
        irettesette:irette       SETTE   ;
           knesette:kne       SETTE   ;
           motsette:mot       SETTE   ;
         skyldsette:skyld       SETTE   ;
              si:       SI      ;
         forutsi:forut       SI      ;
           oppsi:opp       SI      ;
            utsi:ut       SI      ;
sige:                     SIGE    ;
     sitte:                SITTE   ;
            besitte:be       SITTE   ;
           småsitte:små       SITTE   ;
skjelve:                     SKJELVE ;
              skjære:       SKJÆRE  ;
            avskjære:av       SKJÆRE  ;
            beskjære:be       SKJÆRE  ;
LEXICON regular-verb
påligge:på LIGGE ;
frasi:fra SI ;
tilsi:til SI ;
avsi:av SI ;
fragå:fra GÅ ;
imøtegå:imøte GÅ  ;
